nb: Smak på dyremat: Eple; Avocado; Bacon; Banan; Storfekjøtt; Bete; Blåbær; Bein; Brun ris; Gulrot; Ost; Kylling; Tranebær; And; Fisk; Frukt; Korn; Gress; Skinke; Lam; Lever; Mango; Kjøtt; Blandede smaker; Peanøttsmør; Erter; Peppermynte; Svin; Poteter; Kanin; Ris; Salami; Laks; Sjømat; Spinat; Søtpoteter; Tunfisk; Kalkun; Ikke smaksatt; Kalvekjøtt; Grønnsaker; Hjortekjøtt; Annen
hu: Kisállateledel íze: Alma; Avokádó; Szalonna; Banán; Marhahús; Cukorrépa; Áfonya; Csont; Barna rizs; Sárgarépa; Sajt; Csirke; Vörösáfonya; Kacsa; Hal; Gyümölcs; Gabonafélék; Fű; Sonka; Bárány; Máj; Mangó; Hús; Vegyes ízek; Mogyoróvaj; Borsó; Borsmenta; Sertés; Burgonya; Nyúl; Rizs; Szalámi; Lazac; Tenger gyümölcsei; Spenót; Édesburgonya; Tonhal; Pulyka; Ízesítés nélküli; Borjú; Zöldségek; Szarvas/őz; Egyéb
pt-PT: Sabor da comida para animais de estimação: Maçã; Abacate; Bacon; Banana; Carne bovina; Beterraba; Mirtilo; Osso; Arroz integral; Cenoura; Queijo; Frango; Arando; Pato; Peixe; Frutado; Grãos; Erva; Presunto; Borrego; Fígado; Manga; Carne; Mistura de sabores; Manteiga de amendoim; Ervilhas; Hortelã-pimenta; Carne de porco; Batatas; Coelho; Arroz; Salame; Salmão; Marisco; Espinafre; Batatas doces; Atum; Peru; Sem sabor; Vitela; Vegetais; Carne de caça; Outro
de: Geschmack der Tiernahrung: Apple; Avocado; Speck; Banane; Rind; Bete; Blaubeere; Knochen; Brauner Reis; Karotte; Käse; Hähnchen; Cranberry; Ente; Fisch; Frucht; Getreide; Gras; Schinken; Lamm; Leber; Mango; Fleisch; Gemischte Geschmacksrichtungen; Erdnussbutter; Erbsen; Pfefferminze; Schwein; Kartoffeln; Kaninchen; Reis; Salami; Lachs; Meeresfrüchte; Spinat; Süßkartoffeln; Thunfisch; Truthahn; Geschmacksneutral; Kalbfleisch; Gemüse; Wild; Sonstiges
ru: Вкус корма для домашних животных: Яблоко; Авокадо; Бекон; Банан; Говядина; Свекла; Голубика; Кости; Коричневый рис; Морковь; Сыр; Курица; Клюква; Утка; Рыба; Фрукты; Злаки; Трава; Ветчина; Баранина; Печень; Манго; Мясо; Разные вкусы; Арахисовое масло; Горох; Мята перечная; Свинина; Картофель; Кролик; Рис; Салями; Лосось; Морепродукты; Шпинат; Батат; Тунец; Индейка; Без ароматизаторов; Телятина; Овощи; Оленина; Другое
lt-LT: Augintinių ėdalo skonis: Obuoliai; Avokadai; Šoninė; Bananai; Jautiena; Runkeliai; Mėlynės; Kaulas; Rudieji ryžiai; Morkos; Sūris; Vištiena; Spanguolės; Antiena; Žuvis; Vaisiai; Grūdai; Žolė; Kumpis; Ėriena; Kepenys; Mangai; Mėsa; Mišrūs skoniai; Riešutų sviestas; Žirniai; Pipirmėtės; Kiauliena; Bulvės; Triušiena; Ryžiai; Saliamis; Lašiša; Jūros gėrybės; Špinatai; Saldžiosios bulvės; Tunai; Kalakutiena; Nepagardintas; Veršiena; Daržovės; Elniena; Kita
tr: Evcil hayvan maması tadı: Elma; Avokado; Domuz pastırması; Muz; Dana; Pancar; Yaban mersini; Kemik; Esmer pirinç; Havuç; Peynir; Tavuk; Kızılcık; Ördek; Balık; Meyve; Tahıl sirkesi; Çimen; Jambon; Kuzu; Karaciğer; Mango; Et; Karışık tatlar; Fıstık ezmesi; Bezelye; Nane şekeri; Domuz; Patates; Tavşan; Pirinç; Salam; Somon; Deniz Ürünleri; Ispanak; Tatlı Patates; Ton balığı; Hindi; Aromasız; Dana eti; Sebzeler; Geyik eti; Diğer
ja: ペットフードの味: アップル; アボカド; ベーコン; バナナ; ビーフ; ビーツ; ブルーベリー; ボーン; 玄米; にんじん; チーズ; 鶏肉; クランベリー; ダック; 魚; フルーツ; 穀類; 芝生; ハム; ラム; レバー; マンゴー; 肉; ミックスフレーバー; ピーナッツバター; グリーンピース; ペパーミント; ポーク; ジャガイモ; ウサギ; 米; サラミ; サーモン; シーフード; ほうれん草; サツマイモ; マグロ; 七面鳥; ノンフレーバー; 仔牛肉; 野菜; 鹿肉; その他
fr: Saveur de nourriture pour animaux de compagnie: Pomme; Avocat; Bacon; Banane; Bœuf; Betterave; Myrtille; Os; Riz complet; Carotte; Fromage; Poulet; Canneberge; Canard; Poisson; Fruit; Céréales; Herbe; Jambon; Agneau; Foie; Mangue; Viande; Mélange de saveurs; Beurre de cacahuète; Pois; Menthe poivrée; Porc; Pommes de terre; Lapin; Riz; Salami; Saumon; Fruit de mer; Épinard; Patates douces; Thon; Dinde; Sans saveur; Veau; Légumes; Gibier; Autre
zh-TW: 寵物飼料口味: 蘋果; 酪梨; 培根; 香蕉; 牛肉; 甜菜; 藍莓; 骨製; 糙米; 紅蘿蔔; 起司; 雞肉; 蔓越莓; 鴨子; 魚; 水果; 穀物; 草; 火腿; 羊肉; 肝; 芒果; 肉類; 混合口味; 花生醬; 豌豆; 薄荷; 豬肉; 馬鈴薯; 兔子; 米; 莎樂美腸; 鮭魚; 海鮮; 菠菜; 番薯; 鮪魚; 火雞肉; 無味; 小牛肉; 蔬菜; 鹿肉; 其他
fi: Lemmikkiruoan maku: Omena; Avokado; Pekoni; Banaani; Nauta; Punajuuri; Mustikka; Luu; Ruskea riisi; Porkkana; Juusto; Kana; Karpalo; Ankka; Kala; Hedelmällinen; Vilja; Ruoho; Kinkku; Lammas; Maksa; Mango; Liha; Sekalaiset maut; Maapähkinävoi; Herneet; Piparminttu; Porsas; Perunat; Kani; Riisi; Salami; Lohi; Merenelävät; Pinaatti; Bataatit; Tonnikala; Kalkkuna; Maustamaton; Vasikanliha; Kasvikset; Hirvi/peura; Muu
nl: Smaak huisdiervoeding: Appel; Avocado; Bacon; Banaan; Rundvlees; Biet; Bosbes; Been; Zilvervliesrijst; Wortel; Kaas; Kip; Cranberry; Eend; Vis; Fruit; Granen; Gras; Ham; Lam; Lever; Mango; Vlees; Gemengde smaken; Pindakaas; Erwten; Pepermunt; Varkensvlees; Aardappelen; Konijn; Rijst; Salami; Zalm; Zeevruchten; Spinazie; Zoete aardappelen; Tonijn; Kalkoen; Smaakloos; Kalfsvlees; Groenten; Hert; Andere
hr-HR: Okus hrane za kućne ljubimce: Jabuka; Avokado; Slanina; Banana; Govedina; Repa; Borovnica; Kost; Smeđa riža; Mrkva; Sir; Piletina; Brusnica; Patka; Riba; Voće; Žitarice; Trava; Šunka; Janjetina; Jetrica; Mango; Meso; Miješani okusi; Maslac od kikirikija; Grašak; Paprena metvica; Svinjetina; Krumpir; Zec; Riža; Salama; Losos; Plodovi mora; Špinat; Batat; Tuna; Puretina; Bez okusa; Teletina; Povrće; Divljač; Ostalo
vi: Hương vị thức ăn vật nuôi: Táo; Quả bơ; Thịt xông khói; Chuối; Thịt bò; Củ cải đường; Việt quất; Xương; Gạo lức; Cà rốt; Phô mai; Gà; Nam việt quất; Vịt; Cá; Hoa quả; Ngũ cốc; Cỏ; Giăm bông; Cừu; Gan; Xoài; Thịt; Hương vị hỗn hợp; Bơ lạc; Đậu Hà Lan; Bạc hà cay; Thịt lợn; Khoai tây; Thỏ; Gạo; Salami; Cá hồi; Hải sản; Rau chân vịt; Khoai lang; Cá ngừ; Gà tây; Không có hương vị; Thịt bê; Rau củ; Thịt hươu nai; Khác
cs: Příchuť krmiva pro domácí mazlíčky: Apple; Avokádo; Slanina; Banán; Hovězí maso; Řepa; Borůvka; Kost; Hnědá rýže; Mrkev; Sýr; Kuřecí maso; Brusinka; Kachna; Ryba; Ovocný; Obilní; Tráva; Šunka; Jehněčí maso; Játra; Mango; Maso; Kombinace příchutí; Burákové máslo; Hrášek; Máta peprná; Vepřové maso; Brambory; Králík; Rýže; Salám; Losos; Mořské plody; Špenát; Sladké brambory; Tuňák; Krůtí maso; Neochucené; Telecí maso; Zelenina; Zvěřina; Jiné
da: Smag til kæledyrsmad: Æble; Avocado; Bacon; Banan; Bøf; Roer; Blåbær; Knogle; Brune ris; Gulerod; Ost; Kylling; Tranebær; And; Fisk; Frugt; Korn; Græs; Skinke; Lam; Lever; Mango; Kød; Blandede smagsvarianter; Jordnøddesmør; Ærter; Pebermynte; Svin; Kartofler; Kanin; Ris; Salami; Laks; Fisk og skaldyr; Spinat; Søde kartofler; Tun; Kalkun; Uden smag; Kalvekød; Grøntsager; Vildtkød; Andet
ro-RO: Aromă hrană pentru animale de companie: Măr; Avocado; Bacon; Banană; Vită; Sfeclă; Afine; Os; Orez brun; Morcov; Brânză; Pui; Merișor; Rață; Pește; Fructe; Cereale; Iarbă; Șuncă; Miel; Ficat; Mango; Carne; Arome mixte; Unt de arahide; Mazăre; Mentă; Porc; Cartofi; Iepure; Orez; Salami; Somon; Fructe de mare; Spanac; Cartofi dulci; Ton; Curcan; Fără aromă; Vițel; Legume; Vânat; Altele
el: Γεύση τροφής για κατοικίδια: Μήλο; Αβοκάντο; Μπέικον; Μπανάνα; Βοδινό κρέας; Παντζάρι; Μύρτιλο; Οστό; Καστανό ρύζι; Καρότο; Τυρί; Κοτόπουλο; Κράνμπερι; Για το χιόνι; Ψάρι; Φρούτα; Σιτηρά; Χλόη; Ζαμπόν; Αρνάκι; Συκώτι; Μάνγκο; Κρέας; Μικτές γεύσεις; Φιστικοβούτυρο; Αρακάς; Μέντα; Χοιρινό; Πατάτες; Κουνέλι; Ρύζι; Σαλάμι; Σολομός; Θαλασσινά; Σπανάκι; Γλυκοπατάτες; Τόνος; Γαλοπούλα; Χωρίς γεύση; Μοσχάρι; Λαχανικά; Ελάφι; Άλλο
zh-CN: 宠物食品口味: 苹果; 鳄梨; 培根; 香蕉; 牛肉; 甜菜根; 蓝莓; 骨头; 糙米; 胡萝卜; 芝士/西式奶酪; 鸡肉; 蔓越莓; 鸭蛋; 鱼; 果类; 谷物; 草; 火腿; 羊肉; 肝; 芒果; 肉类; 混合口味; 花生酱; 豌豆; 胡椒薄荷; 猪肉; 土豆; 兔子; 大米; 萨拉米肠; 三文鱼; 海鲜; 菠菜; 红薯; 金枪鱼; 火鸡肉; 无味; 小牛肉; 蔬菜; 鹿肉; 其他
ko: 반려동물 사료 맛: 사과; 아보카도; 베이컨; 바나나; 소고기; 비트; 블루베리; 뼈; 현미; 당근; 치즈; 닭고기; 크랜베리; 오리; 물고기; 과일; 곡물; 풀; 햄; 양고기; 간; 망고; 고기; 혼합 향료; 땅콩버터; 완두콩; 페퍼민트; 돼지고기; 감자; 토끼; 쌀; 살라미; 연어; 해산물; 시금치; 고구마; 참치; 칠면조; 무향; 송아지고기; 채소; 사슴고기; 기타
sl-SI: Okus hrane za hišne ljubljenčke: Jabolko; Avokado; Slanina; Banana; Govedina; Pesa; Borovnica; Kost; Rjavi riž; Korenje; Sir; Piščanec; Brusnica; Raca; Ribe; Sadje; Žitarice; Trava; Šunka; Jagnjetina; Jetra; Mango; Meso; Mešani okusi; Arašidovo maslo; Grah; Poprova meta; Svinjina; Krompir; Zajec; Riž; Salama; Losos; Morski sadeži; Špinača; Sladki krompir; Tuna; Puran; Brez okusa; Teletina; Zelenjava; Divjačina; Drugo
en: Pet food flavor: Apple; Avocado; Bacon; Banana; Beef; Beet; Blueberry; Bone; Brown rice; Carrot; Cheese; Chicken; Cranberry; Duck; Fish; Fruit; Grains; Grass; Ham; Lamb; Liver; Mango; Meat; Mixed flavors; Peanut butter; Peas; Peppermint; Pork; Potatoes; Rabbit; Rice; Salami; Salmon; Seafood; Spinach; Sweet potatoes; Tuna; Turkey; Unflavored; Veal; Vegetables; Venison; Other
pl: Smak karmy dla zwierząt: Jabłko; Awokado; Bekon; Banan; Wołowina; Burak; Borówka; Kość; Ryż brązowy; Marchewka; Ser; Kurczak; Żurawina; Kaczka; Ryby; Owoc; Ziarna; Trawa; Szynka; Jagnięcina; Wątroba; Mango; Mięso; Smaki mieszane; Masło orzechowe; Groszek; Mięta pieprzowa; Wieprzowina; Ziemniaki; Królik; Ryż; Salami; Łosoś; Ryby i owoce morza; Szpinak; Słodkie ziemniaki; Tuńczyk; Indyk; Niearomatyzowany; Cielęcina; Warzywa; Sarnina; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Príchuť krmiva pre domáce zvieratá: Jablko; Avokádo; Slanina; Banán; Hovädzie mäso; Repa; Čučoriedka; Kosť; Ryža natural; Mrkva; Syr; Kuracie; Brusnica; Kačka; Ryby; Ovocie; Obilie; Tráva; Šunka; Jahňacie; Pečeň; Mango; Mäso; Zmiešané príchute; Arašidové maslo; Hrach; Mäta pieporná; Bravčové mäso; Zemiaky; Králik; Ryža; Saláma; Losos; Morské plody; Špenát; Sladké zemiaky; Tuniak; Moriak; Neochutený; Teľacie mäso; Zelenina; Zverina; Iné
es: Sabor de comida para mascotas: Manzana; Aguacate; Tocino; Plátano; Ternera; Remolacha; Arándano; Hueso; Arroz integral; Zanahoria; Queso; Pollo; Arándanos; Pato; Pez; Frutal; Granos; Hierba; Jamón; Cordero; Hígado; Mango; Carne; Mezcla de sabores; Mantequilla de cacahuete; Guisantes; Menta; Cerdo; Patatas; Conejo; Arroz; Salami; Salmón; Mariscos; Espinaca; Boniatos; Atún; Pavo; Sin sabor; Ternera; Verduras; Venado; Otros
th: รสชาติอาหารสัตว์เลี้ยง: แอปเปิล; อาโวคาโด; เบคอน; กล้วย; เนื้อวัว; บีต; บลูเบอร์รี; กระดูก; ข้าวกล้อง; แครอท; ชีส; ไก่; แครนเบอร์รี; เป็ด; ปลา; ผลไม้; ธัญพืช; หญ้า; แฮม; เนื้อแกะ; ตับ; มะม่วง; เนื้อสัตว์; รสชาติผสม; เนยถั่ว; ถั่วลันเตา; เปปเปอร์มินต์; เนื้อหมู; มันฝรั่ง; กระต่าย; ข้าว; ซาลามี; ปลาแซลมอน; อาหารทะเล; ปวยเล้ง; มันเทศ; ปลาทูน่า; ตุรกี; ไม่ปรุงแต่ง; เนื้อลูกวัว; ผัก; เนื้อกวาง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Вкус на храна за домашни любимци: Ябълка; Авокадо; Бекон; Банан; Говеждо месо; Цвекло; Боровинка; Кокъл; Кафяв ориз; Морков; Сирене; Пилешко; Червена боровинка; Патешко; Риба; Плодове; Зърна; Трева; Шунка; Агнешко; Черен дроб; Манго; Месо; Смесени аромати; Фъстъчено масло; Грах; Мента; Свинско; Картофи; Заек; Ориз; Салам; Сьомга; Морски дарове; Спанак; Сладки картофи; Риба тон; Пуешко; Неовкусена; Телешко; Зеленчуци; Еленско месо; Други
pt-BR: Sabor de comida para animais de estimação: Maçã; Abacate; Bacon; Banana; Carne bovina; Beterraba; Mirtilo; Osso; Arroz castanho; Cenoura; Queijo; Galinha; Oxicoco; Pato; Peixe; Fruta; Grãos; Grama; Presunto; Carne de cordeiro; Fígado; Manga; Carne; Mix de sabores; Manteiga de amendoim; Ervilhas; Hortelã-pimenta; Carne de porco; Batatas; Coelho; Arroz; Salame; Salmão; Frutos do mar; Espinafre; Batatas doces; Atum; Peru; Sem sabor; Vitela; Legumes; Carne de veado; Outro
it: Gusto del cibo per animali domestici: Mela; Avocado; Bacon; Banana; Manzo; Barbabietola; Mirtillo; Osso; Riso integrale; Carota; Formaggio; Pollo; Mirtillo rosso; Anatra; Pesce; Frutto; Cereali; Erba; Prosciutto; Agnello; Fegato; Mango; Carne; Aromi misti; Burro di arachidi; Piselli; Menta piperita; Maiale; Patate; Coniglio; Riso; Salame; Salmone; Frutti di mare; Spinaci; Patate dolci; Tonno; Tacchino; Non aromatizzato; Vitello; Verdure; Carne di cervo; Altro
sv: Smak på husdjursfoder: Äpple; Avokado; Bacon; Banan; Nötkött; Beta; Blåbär; Ben; Brunt ris; Morot; Ost; Kyckling; Tranbär; Anka; Fisk; Frukt; Spannmål; Gräs; Skinka; Lamm; Lever; Mango; Kött; Blandade smaker; Jordnötssmör; Ärter; Pepparmynta; Fläsk; Potatis; Kanin; Ris; Salami; Lax; Skaldjur; Spenat; Sötpotatis; Tonfisk; Kalkon; Ej smaksatt; Kalvkött; Grönsaker; Vilt; Annat